Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-208 Vehicle insurance defined.
(a) Vehicle insurance is insurance against loss of or damage to any land
vehicle or aircraft or any draft or riding animal or to property while
contained therein or thereon or being loaded or unloaded therein or therefrom,
and against any loss, expense or liability for loss or damage to persons or
property resulting from or incident to ownership, maintenance, or use of any
such vehicle or aircraft or animal.

(b) Insurance against accidental death or
accidental injury to individuals including the named insured while in,
entering, alighting from, adjusting, repairing, cranking, or caused by being
struck by a vehicle, aircraft, or draft or riding animal, if such insurance is
issued as part of insurance on the vehicle, aircraft, or draft or riding
animal, shall be deemed to be vehicle insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next